Massachusetts, session 194th, H2951.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Group 4 of paragraph (g) of subdivision (2) of section 3 of chapter 32 of the 
General Law, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in 
lines 327 and 328, the words:- ; "chief of security for the University of Massachusetts medical 
school or supervisory identification agent,". 
SECTION 2. Group 4 of said paragraph (g) of said subsection (2) of said section 3 of 
chapter 32 as so appearing, is hereby further amended by adding after the words "parole officer," 
in lines 327 and 328, the following words:- "chief of police for the University of Massachusetts 
medical school and police officers of the University of Massachusetts as defined in section 1 of 
chapter 6E,". 

of 2 10  SECTION 3. Group 2 of paragraph (g) of subdivision (2) of section 3 of chapter 32 of the 
General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 253 and 254, the 
words:-  "University of Massachusetts police,".